data/grammar/fst/phonology.xfscript
! k->n: found via "inuk"+"nut"/tn-dat-p's own plain candidate needing
! "inunnut" (own k assimilating to the following n), and "nut"'s new
! "nu"-only variant (see lexicon.lexc's comment there) needing
! "inunnu" the same way. Same family again.
  .o. [ k -> n || _ n ]

! TNNOMD marker (see lexicon.lexc's comment on "k"/tn-nom-d in
! NounEndings for the full investigation): duplicates whichever vowel
! (a/i/u) immediately precedes it, then deletes itself -- unlike every
! other marker above, the ending contributes NOTHING to the surface
! besides that copied vowel, not even a consonant. TNNOMD's OWN deletion
! rule must be conditional on a vowel actually preceding it (same
! [a|i|u] context as the insertion rules), NOT unconditional like every
! other marker's own deletion rule above (SUPPR/VVNG/NASAL/MINSERT/etc.
! all delete unconditionally, since THEIR insertion/rewrite always fires
! regardless of context, just sometimes as a no-op) -- TNNOMD's insertion
! is genuinely CONTEXT-GATED (only 3 of many possible preceding letters
! trigger it), so an unconditional deletion once let the marker silently
! vanish after ANY consonant-final root too, giving every ordinary noun a
! spurious extra "+k/tn-nom-d" reading with zero surface change -- caught
! via a correct-not-present spike in full_corpus_check.py's summary
! counts, not by manual review of individually-tested words.
  .o. [ 0 -> a || a _ TNNOMD ]
  .o. [ 0 -> i || i _ TNNOMD ]
  .o. [ 0 -> u || u _ TNNOMD ]
  .o. [ TNNOMD -> 0 || [ a | i | u ] _ ]

! LENIENT marker: mirrors the real analyzer's own "--lenient-decomps"
! extension (MorphologicalAnalyzer_R2L.kt's own
! _decomposeForFinalConsonantPossiblyMissing, confirmed by reading that
! method directly, not guessed from the CLI flag's own description alone)
! -- Benoit's Kotlin code unconditionally runs a SECOND pass for any
! surface word ending in a vowel, treating it as though a final
! k/p/q/t (Lexicon.consonants) may have been silently dropped, and unions
! those extra decompositions in alongside the normal ones (not a
! retry-on-failure -- it always runs, regardless of whether the first
! pass found anything). Modeled here as an OPTIONAL final-consonant
! deletion at the very end of the GENERATED word, gated on the SAME
! condition Benoit's code checks (what remains after removing the
! guessed consonant must end in a vowel): "(->)" (parenthesized arrow)
! is xfst's OPTIONAL replace operator, which keeps BOTH the
! with-consonant and without-consonant surface forms as parallel paths
! in the transducer, exactly like Benoit's own "union both passes"
! behavior -- rather than a plain "->" which would replace unconditionally
! and lose the original consonant-final form.
!
! WEIGHTED (not tagged with a new marker symbol like every rule above)
! specifically because .o. composition can only ever rewrite the LOWER
! side of the tape -- the lexicon's own UPPER (lexical/tag) side is fixed
! once `read regex Lexicon` runs at the top of this file, so there's no
! way for a rule composed in later to inject a distinguishing symbol into
! the analysis output itself. Weight, unlike a tag, travels through
! composition regardless of which side changed, and hfst-lookup already
! reports it as its own column (confirmed empirically against a
! standalone toy lexicon before adding this real rule: "aak"->"aak"/0.0,
! "aa"->"aak"/1.0, i.e. the SHORTER, consonant-missing surface form
! recovers the full lexical analysis at weight 1.0, while the
! already-complete form stays at weight 0.0 as before) -- so the
! strict/lenient switch becomes a plain Python-side weight filter (weight
! 0 only = strict; weight <=1 = lenient) over the SAME compiled .hfstol
! file, no second FST to build/maintain going forward.
  .o. [ [ k | p | q | t ]::1.0 (->) 0 || [ a | e | i | o | u ] _ .#. ]
  ;
save stack lexicon-generator.hfst
